Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1949.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1003, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1003. As used in The Plumbing License Law of 1955:
1. “Board” means the Construction Industries Board;
2. “Committee” means the Oklahoma State Committee of Plumbing
Examiners appointed by the Construction Industries Board;
3. “Plumbing Hearing Board” means the State Plumbing Hearing
Board which shall consist of a designee of the Construction
Industries Board, as chair, and the members of the Oklahoma State
Committee of Plumbing Examiners;
4. “Apprentice” or “plumber’s apprentice” means any person
sixteen (16) years of age or older who, as the principal occupation
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1949 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of t he person, is engaged in learning and assisting in the
installation of plumbing under the direct supervision of a licensed
journeyman plumber or plumbing contractor;
5. “Journeyman plumber” means any person other than a master
plumber or plumbing contractor who engages in or works at the actual
installation, alteration, repair and/or, or renovation of plumbing;
6. “Temporary journeyman plumber” means any person other than a
person permanently licensed as a journeyman plumber, master plumber,
or plumbing contractor in this state who meets the temporary
licensure requirements of Section 1006.1 of this title;
7. “Master plumber” is a term used and defined under laws which
have been repealed. A person formerly known as a master plumber is
henceforth to be known as a “plumbing contractor” as defined in this
section;
8. “Plumbing contractor” means any person who is skilled in the
planning, superintending, and practical installation of plumbing and
who is familiar with the laws and rules governing the same. This
definition may be construed to mean any person who has qualified and
is licensed under The Plumbing License Law of 1955 as a plumbing
contractor, who may operate as an individual, a firm, partnership,
limited liability company, or corporation, or other legal entity to
engage in the business of plumbing, or the business of contracting
to do plumbing, or furnish labor or materials or both for the
installation, repair, maintenance, or renovation of plumbing
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1949 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

acco rding to the requirements of The Plumbing License Law of 1955.
Any former master plumber shall be known as a plumbing contractor;
9. 8. “Plumbing” means, and includes:
a. all piping, fixtures, appurtenances, and appliances
for, and in connection with, a supply of water within
or adjacent to any building, structure, or conveyance,
on the premises and to the connection with a water
main or other source of supply,
b. all piping, fixtures, appurtenances, and appliances
for sanitary drainage or storm drainage facilities,
including venting systems for such facilities, within
or adjacent to any building, structure, or conveyance,
on the premises and to the connection with a public
disposal system or other acceptable terminal,
c. the installation, repair, maintenance, and renovation
of all piping, fixtures, appurtenances, and appliances
for a supply of water, or for the disposal of waste
water, liquid waste, or sewage within or adjacent to
any building, structure, or conveyance, on the
premises and to the source of supply of water or point
of disposal of wastes, and
d. the installation, repair, and maintenance of radiant-
floor heating system piping in residential homes with
capacities no greater than one hundred thousand
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1949 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(100,000) BTU’s BTUs using only piping approved by the
most current adopted edition of the International
Mechanical Code; and
9. “Utility contractor” means a corporation, partnership, or
sole proprietorship in good legal standing that specializes in the
construction, installation, maintenance, and repair of underground
infrastructure systems including water, sanitary sewer, storm or
drainage sewer, or gas, on behalf of a utility owner or the property
owner; and
10. “Variance and Appeals Board” means the Oklahoma State
Plumbing Installation Code Variance and Appeals Board.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1017, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1017. The provisions of The Plumbing License Law of
1955 shall not apply to:
1. Minor repairs, consisting of repairing or replacing faucets
or minor working parts of plumbing fixtures;
2. Farm buildings located outside any city or town unless such
buildings are connected to a public water or sewer system;
3. Maintenance work for state institutions and school
districts;
4. The installation, maintenance, repair, renovation of
automatic sprinkler systems and related mechanical appurtenances
beginning at a point where the pipe or piping system provides water
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1949 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

used exclusively for these automatic sprinklers and their related
appurtenances and to standpipes connected to automatic sprinkler
systems;
5. The construction, installation, maintenance, repair,
renovation, and/or or removal of pipe or piping systems and related
mechanical appurtenances including backflow preventers, appliances
and/or or equipment used in connection therewith, directly or
indirectly within or without any building or structure, from a point
or location in a source of potable water supply at which point or
location there exists any backflow preventer, provided that said the
pipe and/or or piping systems are for:
a. heating, except radiant-floor heating systems as
defined provided for in subparagraph d of paragraph 9
8 of Section 1003 of this title,
b. cooling,
c. air conditioning,
d. refrigeration, or
e. boilers and other pressure vessels of whatsoever any
kind and character.
A “backflow preventer,”, as used herein in this paragraph, means
any permanent mechanical device, or combination of permanent
mechanical devices, of whatever any material, which, after
installation, acts to prevent a reversal of the normal directional
flow of potable water within the piping system in which it is
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1949 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

inst alled, and. Such term shall include, but not be limited to,
metal checkvalves check valves and airgaps air gaps, either
naturally or artificially created. Provided, further, that the
exclusionary provisions of this paragraph shall apply only to and
within governmental agencies, counties, cities, and towns which now
have or which hereafter may adopt separate laws relating to the
licensing, registration, and regulating of persons engaged, for
business purposes, in any of the areas of trade hereinbefore
specified in this paragraph; the. The exemptions herein being
provided to set forth in this paragraph shall apply only to these
items specifically regulated by any such local laws and ordinances;
and
6. An individual who performs plumbing work on such
individual’s property of residence; or
7. When the work is performed by a utility contractor who has a
Department of Environmental Quality Class D Operator certification:
a. plumbing work consisting of installing, servicing, or
repairing service mains, service lines, or sewer, gas,
or storm drainage services on private property in an
area that extends from a public right-of-way or public
easement to not less than five (5) feet from a
building or structure,
b. downspout boots, or
c. fire risers.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1949 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Work performed pursuant to paragraph 7 of this subsection shall
be done under the scope of the bond of the utility contractor and
shall not be done on repairs on previous work completed by a
plumbing contractor.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
March 5, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS


















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1949 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)